District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.06

Known claims against dissolved corporation.

(a)

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by notifying its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date.

(b)

The written notice shall:

(1)

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

(2)

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

(3)

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation must receive the claim; and

(4)

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(c)

A claim against the dissolved corporation shall be barred if a claimant:

(1)

That was given written notice under subsection (b) of this section does not deliver the claim to the dissolved corporation by the deadline; or

(2)

Whose claim was rejected by the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days from the effective date of the rejection notice.

(d)

For purposes of this section, the term “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-312.07, § 29-312.09, and § 29-312.23.